data/hungarian.aff
SFX A   a    ánkéiul      a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS]
SFX A   a    ánkéitól     a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL]
SFX A   a    ánkéit       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC]
SFX A   a    ánkéiról     a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL]
SFX A   a    ánkéira      a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL]
SFX A   a    ánkéinál     a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE]
SFX A   a    ánkéinak     a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT]
SFX A   a    ánkéin       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE]
SFX A   a    ánkéiig      a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM]
SFX A   a    ánkéihoz     a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL]
SFX A   a    ánkéig       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM]
SFX A   a    ánkéiból     a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA]
SFX A   a    ánkéiban     a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE]
SFX A   a    ánkéiba      a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL]
SFX A   a    ánkéi        a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
SFX A   a    ánkéhoz      a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL]
SFX A   a    ánkéból      a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA]
SFX A   a    ánkéban      a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE]
SFX A   a    ánkéba       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL]
SFX A   a    ánké         a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM]
SFX A   a    ánkul        a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[ESS]
SFX A   a    ánktól       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[ABL]
SFX A   a    ánkról       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[DEL]
SFX A   a    ánkra        a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[SBL]
SFX A   a    ánkon        a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[SUE]
SFX A   a    ánknál       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[ADE]
SFX A   a    ánknak       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[DAT]
SFX A   a    ánkként      a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[FORM]
SFX A   a    ánkká        a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[TRANS]
SFX A   a    ánkkor       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[TEMP]
SFX A   a    ánkkal       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[INSTR]
SFX A   a    ánkig        a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[TERM]
SFX A   a    ánkhoz       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[ALL]
SFX A   a    ánkból       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[ELA]
SFX A   a    ánkban       a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[INE]
SFX A   a    ánkba        a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[ILL]
SFX A   a    ánkat        a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[ACC]
SFX A   a    ánk          a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[NOM]
SFX A   a    ánk          a                         [POSS_PL_1]+[ACC]
SFX A   a    áméért       a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX A   a    ámévá        a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS]
SFX A   a    áméval       a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR]
SFX A   a    áméul        a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS]
SFX A   a    ámétól       a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL]
SFX A   a    ámét         a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC]
SFX A   a    áméról       a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL]
SFX A   a    ámért        a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX A   a    áméra        a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL]
SFX A   a    áménál       a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE]
SFX A   a    áménak       a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT]
SFX A   a    ámén         a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE]
SFX A   a    ámékéért     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX A   a    ámékévá      a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS]
SFX A   a    ámékéval     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR]
SFX A   a    ámékéul      a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS]
SFX A   a    ámékétól     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL]
SFX A   a    ámékét       a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC]
SFX A   a    ámékéról     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL]
SFX A   a    ámékért      a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX A   a    ámékéra      a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL]
SFX A   a    ámékénál     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE]
SFX A   a    ámékénak     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT]
SFX A   a    ámékén       a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE]
SFX A   a    ámékéiért    a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX A   a    ámékéivá     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS]
SFX A   a    ámékéival    a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR]
SFX A   a    ámékéiul     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS]
SFX A   a    ámékéitól    a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL]
SFX A   a    ámékéit      a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC]
SFX A   a    ámékéiról    a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL]
SFX A   a    ámékéira     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL]
SFX A   a    ámékéinál    a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE]
SFX A   a    ámékéinak    a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT]
SFX A   a    ámékéin      a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE]
SFX A   a    ámékéiig     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM]
SFX A   a    ámékéihoz    a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL]
SFX A   a    ámékéig      a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM]
SFX A   a    ámékéiból    a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA]
SFX A   a    ámékéiban    a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE]
SFX A   a    ámékéiba     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL]
SFX A   a    ámékéi       a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
SFX A   a    ámékéhoz     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL]
SFX A   a    ámékéból     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA]
SFX A   a    ámékéban     a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE]
SFX A   a    ámékéba      a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL]
SFX A   a    áméké        a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM]
SFX A   a    ámékul       a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[ESS]
SFX A   a    áméktól      a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[ABL]
SFX A   a    ámékról      a                         [POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[DEL]
