data/hungarian.dic
öntőminta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
átalakító/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
Újlakszanticska/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
ÁVO-s/ŇŮmAFUKQ	ÁVO[noun]{+[NOM]}+[s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}
vödörfogó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
vitorla/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
varga/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
túlzó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇťX	[noun]{+[NOM]}
tunika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
tojássárga/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
tempó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
taksa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szépapa/ŐAUĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szonatina/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szeparáció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szablya/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
sligovica/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
rágógumi/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
reverencia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
rajongó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
punci/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
predikció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
plasztika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
pauperizáció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
padlásszoba/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
okostóni/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
nyolcmillió/ĎŇŐAUQbcjKkaż	[adj_num]{+[NOM]}
negyvenegytrillió/ĎŇŐAUQbci	[adj_num]{+[NOM]}
másik/UŇmc˛kAŮKQ	[noun]{+[NOM]}
mogyoróhagyma/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
melltartó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
makrofizika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
lárma/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
lepleznivaló/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kötőtégla/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kálvária/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kotró/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇťX	[noun]{+[NOM]}
komponista/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kisolló/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kettőtrillió/ĎŇŐAUQbci	[adj_num]{+[NOM]}
kapituláció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
játékgolyó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
interrogáció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
iglu/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
holdsarló/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
harminchéttrillió/ĎŇŐAUQbci	[adj_num]{+[NOM]}
gyermekkocsi/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
fénytompító/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
filozófia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
eszperantista/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
duzzadt/XADFQU#	duzzad[vrb]+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}
decepció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
clemenceau-i/ŃĎŐAFUKSs	Clemenceau[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}+[i_PLACE/TIME_adj]{+[NOM]}
borravaló/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
automatika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
allergológia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
ártájékoztató/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ	[adj]{+[NOM]}
technikai/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ	[adj]{+[NOM]}
rasszista/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ	[adj]{+[NOM]}
nagyarányú/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ	[adj]{+[NOM]}
kéjvágyó/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ	[adj]{+[NOM]}
hosszirányú/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ	[adj]{+[NOM]}
fonológiai/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ	[adj]{+[NOM]}
crô-magnoni/°AŇŐĎFUÎQ	[adj]{+[NOM]}
Zsófika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżßˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Vitalisfalú/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Táborszky/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQˇk	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Tamásváralja/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Szolcsánka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Stóla/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Ráhó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Péntekfalu/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Pennsylvania/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Ocsvay/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQˇk	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Nagyjécsa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Mikháza/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Maconka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Lajtafalu/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Krajnikfalva/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Kiskirva/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Kalistja/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Ista-Pista/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqßˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Herpay/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQˇk	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Gyertyánfa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Frumusika/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Farkasdy/UĘŽiŐAĎŃqÇżßQˇk	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Dolgonya/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Csikériapuszta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Bárdháza/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Bonfini/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqÇżßˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Behárfalu/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Aranyoslonka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
Agó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇqľˇ	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
